District of Columbia statutes.
22-4244

District of Columbia Criminal Justice Coordinating Council defined.

In this subchapter, the term “District of Columbia Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” means the entity established by the Council of the District of Columbia under subchapter I of this chapter.

History

May 20, 2002, 116 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 107-180, § 5